Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1806
Inquest; subpoenas; power to issue.

The coroner may issue subpoenas within the county for witnesses, returnable forthwith, or at such time and place as the coroner shall therein direct.

Laws 1879, § 102, p. 382;

R.S.1913, § 5668;

C.S.1922, § 4998;

C.S.1929, § 26-1507;

R.S.1943, § 23-1806;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 72.

Witness must obey subpoena, and can draw fees though inquest was unnecessary. Moore v. Box Butte County, 78 Neb. 561, 111 N.W. 469 (1907).